Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-720
City treasurer; report; warrant register.

The city treasurer of a city of the first class shall report to the mayor and city council annually, and more often if required, at such times as may be prescribed by ordinance, giving a full and detailed account of the receipts and expenditures during the preceding fiscal year, and the state of the treasury. He or she shall also keep a register of all warrants redeemed and paid during the year, describing such warrants, their date, amount, number, time of payment, the fund from which paid, and the person to whom paid. All such warrants shall be examined by the finance committee at the time of making such annual report.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 91, p. 296;

R.S.1913, § 4986;

C.S.1922, § 4155;

C.S.1929, § 16-717;

R.S.1943, § 16-720;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 187;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 86.